California, session 20252026, AB534.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 16522.05 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:16522.05. (a) Contracts (1) A contract for a transitional housing placement provider, as defined in subdivision (r) of Section 11400, or a Transitional Housing Program-Plus provider, as defined in subdivision (s) of Section 11400, shall have an initial term of 10 three years.(2) After the initial three-year term, a contract may be renewed twice for an additional year per renewal.(3) If a contract has been renewed twice pursuant to paragraph (2), it may be renewed for additional 10-year terms.(b) The county shall have the right to may terminate a contract or a portion of the contracted services prior to the end of the contract term by providing at least 90 days’ notice to the contractor.(c)Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the county and contractor may agree to enter into an extension of the contract, either at the time of the initial contract or at any time thereafter.SEC. 2. To the extent that this act has an overall effect of increasing the costs already borne by a local agency for programs or levels of service mandated by the 2011 Realignment Legislation within the meaning of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, it shall apply to local agencies only to the extent that the state provides annual funding for the cost increase. Any new program or higher level of service provided by a local agency pursuant to this act above the level for which funding has been provided shall not require a subvention of funds by the state or otherwise be subject to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.